test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_EEHL_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_EEHL_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_EEHL_STEM_2

     hltanée.eehl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hltanée.eelga
     hltanée.eehl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hltanée.eelgang
     hltanée.eehl+V+DIRECT+PAST: hltanée.eelgan
     hltanée.eehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hltanée.eelaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+INDIRECT+PAST: hltanée.eelaan
     hltanée.eehl+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hltanée.eelaas
     hltanée.eehl+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eelaa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelgang
     hltanée.eehl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelganggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eelgangang
     hltanée.eehl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelgiinii
     hltanée.eehl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelgaangaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelgaangaan
     hltanée.eehl+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: hltanée.eelaa'ahlang
     hltanée.eehl+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hltanée.eelaa'ahlanggaa
     hltanée.eehl+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hltanée.eelaa'ahlanggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelgang'waa
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelgang'waang
     hltanée.eehl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eelgang'waa.ang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelgang'anggang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eelgang'angang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelgang'ang'waa
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hltanée.eelgang'ang'waang
     hltanée.eehl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hltanée.eelgang'ang'waa.ang
